Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.085, is amended to read: 124D.085 EXPERIENTIAL AND APPLIED LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES FOR STUDENTS. (a) To strengthen the alignment between career and college ready curriculum and state and local academic standards and increase students' opportunities for participating in applied and experiential learning in a nontraditional setting, school districts are encouraged to provide programs such asnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end magnet schoolsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2)new text end language immersion programsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (3)new text end project-based learningdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (4)new text end accelerated learningdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (5)new text end college prep schoolsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (6)new text end career and technical educationdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (7)new text end Montessori schoolsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (8)new text end military schoolsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (9)new text end work-based schoolsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and new text begin (10)new text end place-based learning. new text begin (b)new text end Districts may provide such programs independently or in cooperation with other districts, at a school single site, for particular grades, or throughout the district. In addition to meeting the other accountability measures under chapter 120B, districts may declare that a student meets or exceeds specific academic standards required for graduation under the rigorous course of study waiver in section 120B.021, subdivision 1a, where appropriate. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The board of a district that chooses to participate must publicly adopt and review a plan for providing a program under this section. The plan must: define the program and its structure; describe the enrollment process; identify measures and processes for regularly assessing, evaluating, and publicly reporting on program efficacy and use summary data to show student progress and outcomes; and establish a data-informed public process for modifying and revising the plan as needed. A district must publish its plan contents and evaluation outcomes on the district website. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end For purposes of further integrating experiential and applied learning into career and college ready curricula, the commissioner may request program information from providing districts under this sectionnew text begin , but is not authorized to approve or deny any school board-adopted program provided under this sectionnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.093, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. deleted text begin Applicationdeleted text end new text begin Board approvalnew text end process. deleted text begin The commissioner must determine the form and manner of application for a school to be designated a P-TECH school.deleted text end The deleted text begin applicationdeleted text end new text begin school board plan for adopting a P-TECH programnew text end must contain at least the following information: (1) the written agreement between a public school, a higher education institution under section 124D.09, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), and a business partner to jointly develop and support a P-TECH school; (2) a proposed school design consistent with subdivisions 1 and 2; (3) a description of how the P-TECH school supports the needs of the economic development region in which the P-TECH school is to be located; (4) a description of the facilities to be used by the P-TECH school; (5) a description of proposed budgets, curriculum, transportation plans, and other operating procedures for the P-TECH school; (6) the process by which students will be enrolled in the P-TECH school; (7) the qualifications required for individuals employed in the P-TECH school; and (8) any additional information that the deleted text begin commissioner requiresdeleted text end new text begin board determines is appropriatenew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.093, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. deleted text begin Approvaldeleted text end new text begin Grantnew text end process. (a) new text begin When an appropriation is available, new text end the commissioner of education must appoint an advisory committee to review the applications and to recommend approval for those applications that meet the requirements of this section. The commissioner of education has final authority over application approvals. (b) To the extent practicable, the commissioner must ensure an equitable geographic distribution of approved P-TECH schools. new text begin (c) Nothing in this subdivision may be construed to authorize the commissioner to approve or deny a locally adopted P-TECH plan. new text end Sec. 4. Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 5, article 2, section 52, is amended to read: Sec. 52. new text begin EDUCATION new text end INNOVATION deleted text begin RESEARCHdeleted text end ZONES deleted text begin PILOTdeleted text end PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Establishment; requirements for participation; deleted text begin researchdeleted text end new text begin innovationnew text end zone plans. (a) The innovation deleted text begin researchdeleted text end zone deleted text begin pilotdeleted text end program is established to improve student and school outcomes consistent with the deleted text begin world's best workforcedeleted text end new text begin comprehensive achievement and civic readinessnew text end requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.11. Innovation zone partnerships allow school districts and charter schools to research and implement innovative education programming models designed to better prepare students for the world of the 21st century. (b) One or more school districts or charter schools may join together to form an innovation zone partnership. The partnership may include other nonschool partners, including postsecondary institutions, other units of local government, nonprofit organizations, and for-profit organizations. An innovation zone plan must be collaboratively developed in concert with the school's instructional staff. (c) An innovation deleted text begin researchdeleted text end zone partnership deleted text begin must research anddeleted text end new text begin maynew text end implement innovative education programs and models that deleted text begin are based on proposed hypotheses. An innovation zone plan may include an emerging practice not yet supported by peer-reviewed research. Examples of innovation zone researchdeleted text end may include, but are not limited to: (1) personalized learning, allowing students to excel at their own pace and according to their interests, aspirations, and unique needs; (2) the use of competency outcomes rather than seat time and course completion to fulfill standards, credits, and other graduation requirements; (3) multidisciplinary, real-world, inquiry-based, and student-directed models designed to make learning more engaging and relevant, including documenting and validating learning that takes place beyond the school day and school walls; (4) models of instruction designed to close the achievement gap, including new models for age three to grade 3 models, English as a second language models, early identification and prevention of mental health issues, and others; (5) new partnerships between secondary schools and postsecondary institutions, employers, or career training institutions enabling students to complete industry certifications, postsecondary education credits, and other credentials; (6) new methods of collaborative leadership including the expansion of schools where teachers have larger professional roles; (7) new ways to enhance parental and community involvement in learning; (8) new models of professional development for educators, including embedded professional development; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (9) new models in other areas such as whole child instruction, social-emotional skill development, technology-based or blended learning, parent and community involvement, professional development and mentoring, and models that increase the return on investmentdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (10) new models of evaluation, assessment, and accountability using multiple indicators, including models that demonstrate alternative ways to validate a student's academic attainment that have predictive validity to the state tests, and also include other skills, such as problem solving, creativity, analytical thinking, collaboration, respecting others, global understanding, postgraduation student performance, and other information; new text end new text begin (11) improving teacher and principal mentorship and evaluation; new text end new text begin (12) granting a high school diploma to a student who meets the graduation requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.02, subdivision 2, while providing the student opportunities to: new text end new text begin (i) attain postsecondary credits or degrees through advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or concurrent enrollment courses; or new text end new text begin (ii) participate in career and industrial certification programs, including apprenticeship programs; new text end new text begin (13) exercising the authority granted under Minnesota Statutes, sections 124D.085, governing experiential and applied learning opportunities; and 126C.05, subdivision 15, paragraph (b), item (i), governing the use of independent study; new text end new text begin (14) providing career and technical education programs after school, on weekends, and during school breaks, including summers through a learning year program under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.128 for a student in grade 10, 11, or 12. A district may receive general education revenue funding for the program if it allows a student to earn both high school and postsecondary credit, and to earn a career certification or technical college degree, or participate in an apprenticeship program. A student participating in a learning year program may attend school year round, and the student's continual learning plan must provide for the student to meet the high school graduation standards no later than the end of the fall semester of grade 12; new text end new text begin (15) implementing models that provide students supports or interventions to reduce the need for special education services, and to reduce teacher time devoted to required special education documentation; or new text end new text begin (16) other innovations as determined by the local boards. new text end (d) An innovation zone plan submitted to the commissioner new text begin of education new text end must describe: (1) how the plan will improve student and school outcomes consistent with the deleted text begin world's best workforcedeleted text end new text begin comprehensive achievement and civic readinessnew text end requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.11; (2) the role of each partner in the zone; deleted text begin (3) the research methodology used for each proposed action in the plan; deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the exemptions from statutes and rules in subdivision 2 that the deleted text begin researchdeleted text end new text begin innovationnew text end zone partnership will use; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end a description of how teachers and other educational staff from the affected school sites will be included in the planning and implementation process; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end a detailed description of expected outcomes and graduation standards; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end a timeline for implementing the plan and assessing the outcomes; and deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end how results of the plan will be disseminated. The governing board for each partner must approve the innovation zone plan. (e) Upon unanimous approval of the initial innovation zone partners deleted text begin and approval of the commissioner of educationdeleted text end , the innovation zone partnership may extend membership to other partners. A new partner's membership is effective 30 days after the innovation zone partnership notifies the commissioner of the proposed change in membership deleted text begin unless the commissioner disapproves the new partner's membershipdeleted text end new text begin and updates the plannew text end . (f) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a school district or charter school participating in an innovation zone partnership under this section continues to receive all revenue and maintains its taxation authority in the same manner as before its participation in the innovation zone partnership. The innovation zone school district and charter school partners remain organized and governed by their respective school boards with general powers under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 123B or 124E, and remain subject to any employment agreements under Minnesota Statutes, chapters 122A and 179A. School district and charter school employees participating in an innovation zone partnership remain employees of their respective school district or charter school. (g) An innovation zone partnership may submit its plan at any time to the commissioner in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. deleted text begin The commissioner must approve or reject the plan after reviewing the recommendation of the Innovation Research Zone Advisory Panel. An initial innovation zone plan that has been rejected by the commissioner may be resubmitted to the commissioner after the innovation zone partnership has modified the plan to meet each individually identified objection.deleted text end new text begin (h) An innovation zone plan must not cause an increase in state aid or levies for partners. new text end Subd. 2. Exemptions from laws and rules. (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an innovation zone partner with deleted text begin an approveddeleted text end new text begin anew text end plan new text begin filed with the commissioner new text end is exempt from each of the following state education laws and rules specifically identified in its plan: (1) any law or rule from which a district-created, site-governed school under Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.045, is exempt; (2) any statute or rule from which the commissioner has exempted another district or charter school, as identified in the list published on the Department of Education's deleted text begin Web sitedeleted text end new text begin websitenew text end under subdivision 4, paragraph (b); (3) online learning program approval under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.095, subdivision 7, if the school district or charter school offers a course or program online combined with direct access to a teacher for a portion of that course or program; (4) restrictions on extended time revenue under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.10, subdivision 2a, for a student who meets the criteria of Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.68, subdivision 2; and (5) any required hours of instruction in any class or subject area for a student who is meeting all competencies consistent with the graduation standards described in the innovation zone plan. (b) The exemptions under this subdivision must not be construed as exempting an innovation zone partner from the Minnesota Comprehensive Assessmentsnew text begin or as increasing any state aid or levynew text end . Subd. 3. Innovation Research Zone Advisory Panel. (a) The commissioner must establish and convene an Innovation Research Zone Advisory Panel to review all innovation zone plans submitted for approval. (b) The panel must be composed of nine members. One member must be appointed by each of the following organizations: Educators for Excellence, Education Minnesota, Minnesota Association of Secondary School Principals, Minnesota Elementary School Principals' Association, Minnesota Association of School Administrators, Minnesota School Boards Association, Minnesota Association of Charter Schools, and the Office of Higher Education. The commissioner must appoint one member with expertise in evaluation and research. Subd. 4. new text begin Role of the new text end commissioner deleted text begin approvaldeleted text end . (a) deleted text begin Upon recommendation of the Innovation Research Zone Advisory Panel, the commissioner may approve up to three innovation zone plans in the seven-county metropolitan area and up to three in greater Minnesota.deleted text end If an innovation zone partnership fails to implement its innovation zone plan as described in its application and according to the stated timeline, deleted text begin upon recommendation of the Innovation Research Zone Advisory Panel,deleted text end the commissioner deleted text begin mustdeleted text end new text begin maynew text end alert the partnership members and provide the opportunity to remediate. If implementation continues to fail, the commissioner deleted text begin mustdeleted text end new text begin maynew text end suspend or terminate the innovation zone plan. (b) The commissioner must publish a list of the exemptions the commissioner has granted to a district or charter school on the Department of Education's deleted text begin Web sitedeleted text end new text begin websitenew text end by July 1, 2017. The list must be updated annually. Subd. 5. Project evaluation, dissemination, and report to legislature. Each deleted text begin researchdeleted text end new text begin innovationnew text end zone partnership must submit project data to the commissioner in the form and manner deleted text begin provided for in the approved applicationdeleted text end new text begin specified by the commissionernew text end . At least once every two years, the commissioner deleted text begin mustdeleted text end new text begin maynew text end analyze each innovation zone's progress in realizing the objectives of the innovation zone partnership's plan. new text begin To the extent practicable, and using existing resources, new text end the commissioner deleted text begin mustdeleted text end new text begin maynew text end summarize and categorize innovation zone plans and submit a report to the legislative committees having jurisdiction over education by February 1 of each odd-numbered year in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195. Sec. 5. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin (a) The revisor of statutes shall renumber the provisions of Minnesota Statutes and laws listed in column A to the references listed in column B. The revisor shall also make necessary cross-reference changes in Minnesota Statutes and Minnesota Rules consistent with the renumbering in this instruction. new text end new text begin Column A new text end new text begin Column B new text end new text begin Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 5, article 2, section 52 new text end new text begin 124F.01 new text end new text begin 124D.085 new text end new text begin 124F.02 new text end new text begin 124D.093 new text end new text begin 124F.03 new text end new text begin 124D.4535 new text end new text begin 124F.04 new text end new text begin 124D.46 new text end new text begin 124F.05 new text end new text begin 124D.47 new text end new text begin 124F.06 new text end new text begin 124D.48 new text end new text begin 124F.07 new text end new text begin 124D.49 new text end new text begin 124F.08 new text end new text begin 124D.50 new text end new text begin 124F.09 new text end new text begin (b) Paragraph (a) is intended to be a reorganization of statutes relating to Education Innovation in Minnesota Statutes, chapter 124F, and not intended to change the meaning or prior interpretation of those laws. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 5, article 2, section 52, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Session Laws: H1435-1 Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 5, article 2, section 52, subdivision 3 Sec. 52. new text begin INNOVATION RESEARCH ZONES PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Innovation Research Zone Advisory Panel. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish and convene an Innovation Research Zone Advisory Panel to review all innovation zone plans submitted for approval. new text end new text begin (b) The panel must be composed of nine members. One member must be appointed by each of the following organizations: Educators for Excellence, Education Minnesota, Minnesota Association of Secondary School Principals, Minnesota Elementary School Principals' Association, Minnesota Association of School Administrators, Minnesota School Boards Association, Minnesota Association of Charter Schools, and the Office of Higher Education. The commissioner must appoint one member with expertise in evaluation and research. new text end